Utah statutes.
48-1d-109.   Delivery of record.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, permissible means of delivery of a record include delivery by hand, the United States Postal Service, commercial delivery service, and electronic transmission.

(2)  Delivery to the division is effective only when a record is received by the division.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

